Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-5017
Appeals or petitions; orders authorized.

(1) In resolving an appeal or petition, the commission may make such orders as are appropriate for resolving the dispute but in no case shall the relief be excessive compared to the problems addressed. The commission may make prospective orders requiring changes in assessment practices which will improve assessment practices or affect the general level of assessment or the measures of central tendency in a positive way. If no other relief is adequate to resolve disputes, the commission may order a reappraisal of property within a county, an area within a county, or classes or subclasses of property within a county.

(2) In an appeal specified in subdivision (10) or (11) of section 77-5016 for which the commission determines exempt property to be taxable, the commission shall order the county board of equalization to determine the taxable value of the property, unless the parties stipulate to such taxable value during the hearing before the commission. The order shall require the county board of equalization to determine the taxable value of the property pursuant to section 77-1507, send notice of the taxable value pursuant to section 77-1507 within ninety days after the date the commission's order is certified pursuant to section 77-5018, and apply interest at the rate specified in section 45-104.01, but not penalty, to the taxable value beginning thirty days after the date the commission's order was issued or the date the taxes were delinquent, whichever is later.

(3) A determination of the taxable value of the property made by the county board of equalization pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be appealed to the commission within thirty days after the board's decision as provided in section 77-1507.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 419, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 61;

Laws 2007, LB167, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB384, § 30;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 93.